Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 1. In General
§ 41-2-121.
Criteria for water development projects; disclosure of personal interests by commission.

The water development commission shall establish criteria for evaluation and administration of water development projects. Criteria shall include but not be limited to the following:

All water development proposals submitted to the legislature shall be reviewed by and accompanied by the recommendation of the water development commission;

The commission’s recommendation shall:

Emphasize projects developing unappropriated water;

Give preference wherever possible to projects developing new storage capacity;

Consider the potential for development of hydroelectric power in any project through Level II;

Include a summary of the commission’s findings under W.S. 41-2-112(b);

Include financing methods subject to the following:

Any water development project may be financed by grants not to exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the total cost of the project;

Storage projects may be financed by grants for the full cost of the storage capacity but not to exceed public benefits as computed by the commission;

Loans may be made for domestic, municipal, agricultural, industrial, recreational or fish and wildlife enhancement purposes;

The term of a loan shall not exceed fifty (50) years after substantial completion of a project;

Payment of interest and principal on loans may be deferred for not more than five (5) years after substantial completion of the project;

Loan contracts for project construction shall include provisions to ensure [that] the project shall be operated and maintained during the term of the loan;

The state may elect to own all or a part of a project and enter into water service repayment contracts with project developers;

A project involving a transbasin diversion shall address the impact of the diversion and recommend measures to mitigate any adverse impact identified in the basin of origin;

Interest on a loan should provide a reasonable return to the state but shall not be less than four percent (4%) except when the commission recommends a lower interest rate because of public benefits;

Loan contracts for project construction shall provide for payment of interest on defaulted payments at a rate of ten percent (10%) per annum.

Repealed by Laws 1986, ch. 109, § 3.

The commission may disqualify from consideration or give lower priority to a project proposed to correct problems identified in a review performed by the department of environmental quality under W.S. 18-5-306(c) where the board of county commissioners approved a subdivision application notwithstanding the department’s recommendation that the application be disapproved.

Any member of the commission who has a personal or private interest in any matter proposed or pending before the commission shall publicly disclose this fact to the commission and shall not vote thereon.

Within sixty (60) days after the effective date of this subsection or within sixty (60) days following appointment and annually on or before January 1, each member of the commission shall file written disclosures relative to all interests held by the member or the member’s spouse, including interests in partnerships and corporations, with the secretary of state, of:

Any water rights, permits or applications held, whether for direct flow, reservoirs or underground water;

Any interests in engineering or construction firms which engage in designing or constructing water projects.

The promulgation of operating procedures and program criteria by the commission under this section and decisions of the commission relating to the recommendation, prioritization or disqualification of projects are specifically exempt from all provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act including provisions for judicial review under W.S.

16-3-114

and

16-3-115

.

Prior to authorizing a water development project, the commission shall require each project sponsor to demonstrate that the entity has the authority to adequately assess fees or collect funds to cover operation and maintenance expenses related to the water development project. Any entity that does not have the authority or ability to collect sufficient funds for the operation and maintenance of the project may be required by the commission to establish an operations and maintenance account as provided in this section. The commission shall develop criteria related to the establishment of an operations and maintenance account which shall include:

An operations and maintenance account shall only be required for project sponsors that have taken out a loan for any portion of the project expense and shall not be required after the loan has been repaid;

The funds required in any operations and maintenance account shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the project cost.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 166, § 1; 1984, ch. 52, § 2; 1986, ch. 109, § 3; 1996, ch. 15, § 5; 1997, ch. 179, § 1; 1999, ch. 11, § 1; 2018 ch. 17, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (e).

Editor's notes. —

The phrase “the effective date of this subsection” in subsection (c) first appeared in Laws 1984, ch. 52, which was effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided for by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 16, 1984.

§ 41-2-122.
Protection and rights of landowner.

The Wyoming water development commission shall include in the planning process at Level I notification to a landowner whose lands may be flooded or otherwise physically affected, as determined by the administrator. The commission shall include in the planning process at Level II consultation with any landowner whose land may be flooded or otherwise physically affected by a proposed water project and shall include a report on the proposed mitigation of landowner impacts as jointly identified by the commission and the landowner.

The Wyoming water development commission shall consult with and supply copies of reports and studies to any landowner whose land will be flooded or physically affected by any proposed water development project. The commission and any employees or other persons under the control of the commission shall mitigate any damages and disruption of the landowner’s operations during the study phase including prevention of public nuisances and shall enter on private property only in the manner provided by W.S.

1-26-506

and shall also be subject to W.S.

1-26-507

and

1-26-508

.

In proceeding with Level III, construction and operation plans, the commission shall follow the requirements of the Wyoming Eminent Domain Act, shall negotiate in good faith with affected landowners and, in addition, shall attempt to mitigate damages which may occur from the impacts enumerated in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 228, § 1; 1986, ch. 109, § 1; 1988, ch. 79, § 2.

Wyoming Eminent Domain Act. —

See §§ 1-26-501(a) and 1-26-502(a)(vi).

§ 41-2-123.
Project studies generally; hearings; reimbursement of costs; source of funding; use of unobligated funds; recommendations to legislature.

The commission, after public notice, is authorized to conduct public workshops and public hearings in the affected regions on projects which have been approved for study by the legislature pursuant to W.S.

41-2-114

.

For each project authorized for Level I or Level II study by the legislature, the commission shall make a recommendation on the following alternatives:

Proceed with next level of activity;

Continue study at the presently authorized level of activity; or

Terminate consideration of the project.

Funds appropriated by the legislature for Level I reconnaissance studies and Level II feasibility studies may be included in the costs to be reimbursed by project beneficiaries as provided by W.S. 41-2-112(b)(ii), unless otherwise specifically provided by the legislature.

For projects completed and in use prior to 1970, the funding for Level I and Level II activities shall come from those within water development account II unless otherwise specifically provided by the legislature.

The water development commission may commence and contract for a Level II feasibility study of a project using unobligated funds authorized by law for a Level I reconnaissance study of the project if:

The Level I study is substantially complete;

The due date for the Level I study report established by the legislature has not occurred;

The commission finds the Level II study to be in the best interest of the state;

The select water committee created under W.S.

28-11-101

reviews the commission request to proceed with the Level II study.

All recommendations, including proposed legislation, from the water development commission to the legislature required by law regarding specific water projects shall be presented to the select water committee created by W.S.

28-11-101

not later than fifteen (15) days prior to commencement of the legislature to which the reports are due. The committee shall review and make recommendations to the legislature regarding commission recommendations and proposed legislation.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 79, § 1; 1998, ch. 5, § 2; 2000, ch. 97, § 3.

§ 41-2-124.
Accounts created; unexpended balance.

The following accounts are created:

Water development account I into which shall be deposited revenues pursuant to law;

Water development account II into which shall be deposited revenues pursuant to law;

Water development account III into which shall be deposited revenues pursuant to law.

Any unexpended balance in water development accounts I, II and III as defined by subsection (a) of this section shall be invested by the state treasurer and the interest earned shall be credited to the account.

The state treasurer shall transfer such sums of money from water development accounts I and II created by subsection (a) of this section to the state drinking water revolving loan account created by W.S.

16-1-302

to provide not to exceed one-half (1/2) of the twenty percent (20%) state matching funds for each federal capitalization grant to the drinking water state revolving fund program account. The transferred funds shall be proportioned between water development accounts I and II as directed by the water development commission.

No new dam with storage capacity of less than two thousand (2,000) acre-feet of water or expansion of a dam with a storage capacity of less than one thousand (1,000) acre-feet of water shall be funded with funds from water development account III. Without the approval of the legislature, funds deposited into water development account III shall not be diverted from that account, other than for the purpose of financing projects related to dam construction or expansion.

There is transferred to the water development account III created by paragraph (a)(iii) of this section effective July 1, 2005:

Fifty-four million seventy thousand dollars ($54,070,000.00) from water development account I reserved for the Green River/Wind River project development fund established in W.S. 99-3-604. The transfer of money into water development account III shall not eliminate recognition of the water storage potential in the Green River/Wind River basins;

Ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00) from the budget reserve account.

There is created the emergency water projects account. All funds in the account are continuously appropriated to the water development commission for the purpose of funding emergency water projects as authorized by this subsection and subsections (g) and (h) of this section. Funds within the account shall be invested in the pool A investment account by the state treasurer pursuant to W.S. 9-4-715(p). Earnings from funds in the account shall be deposited in the account. Notwithstanding W.S.

9-1-417

, if the state loan and investment board determines that funds in the account are insufficient to make payment for the full cost of addressing emergency water projects which may occur in any year, the board is authorized to obtain a loan from the legislative stabilization reserve account of up to two million dollars ($2,000,000.00) which loan shall be repaid by interest earnings or loan repayments from the emergency water projects account.

Emergency water projects funded from the emergency water projects account under subsection (f) of this section shall be limited as follows:

Emergency water projects shall consist only of repair, replacement or maintenance that is required for irrigation infrastructure which is rendered or likely to be rendered permanently inoperable due to an act of God including fire, earthquake, hurricane, storm or other similar natural disaster or phenomena or an unforeseen or impending natural or man-made event that requires immediate action to prevent a threat to or loss of life or property;

Only political subdivisions that own or have the legal responsibility to operate or maintain irrigation infrastructure shall be eligible for emergency water project funding.

The commission shall adopt rules providing for eligibility determination, procedures and criteria for the application and award of funds from the emergency water projects account. The total amount awarded under this subsection shall not exceed three million dollars ($3,000,000.00) per fiscal biennium. The maximum grant amount awarded for each emergency project shall not exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the total emergency project costs, the remaining twenty-five percent (25%) may be funded by the commission in the form of a loan. The term of a loan shall not exceed fifty (50) years and interest shall provide a reasonable return and shall not be less than four percent (4%). The commission shall include the total amount of all emergency water project grant or loan funds provided under this subsection and subtract that total from the maximum allowable grant under W.S. 41-2-121(a)(ii)(E)(I) for a subsequent water development project involving the same entity and project components. All emergency water projects account funds awarded under this subsection shall be approved by the state loan and investment board after review and recommendation by the water development commission prior to the release of funds.

The water development commission shall adopt rules authorizing a voluntary pool program within the emergency water projects account. Participant contributions to the voluntary pool program shall be deposited in a subaccount and funds within the subaccount shall be expended only for emergency projects involving a participant in the voluntary pool program. For accounting and investment purposes only, all subaccounts shall be treated as separate accounts. Expenditures from the voluntary pool program may be credited in whole or in part to the twenty-five percent (25%) loan for funding an emergency project of a participant.

As used in this section, “irrigation infrastructure” includes dams, canals, ditches, pipelines, aqueducts, tunnels, pumping stations, drainage and flow regulating structures.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 268, § 1; 1990, ch. 123, § 1; 1998, ch. 5, § 2; ch. 88, § 2; 2000, ch. 97, § 3; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2005, ch. 163, § 1; ch. 231, § 1; 2006, ch. 99, § 8; 2020 ch. 127, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2004 amendment,

in (c), substituted “state drinking water revolving loan” for “drinking water state revolving fund.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 163, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, added (a)(iii); in (b) deleted “After July 1, 1992” at the beginning, and inserted the reference to water development account III; added (d) and (e); and made related changes.

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” at the end of the introductory language in (a).

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out incorporating amendments made by both 2005 acts.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “water development account I reserved for the Green River/Wind River” for “the Level III Green River/Wind River construction” in (e).

Laws 2006, ch. 99, § 8 makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (f) through (k).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 41-2-125.
Office of water programs created; duties; annual report.

There is created the office of water programs within the office of research at the University of Wyoming. The office of water programs shall:

Work directly with the director of the Wyoming water development office to identify research needs of state and federal agencies regarding Wyoming’s water resources, including funding under the National Institutes of Water Resources (NIWR);

Serve as a point of coordination for and to encourage research activities by the University of Wyoming to address the research needs identified in paragraph (i) of this subsection;

In conjunction with the Wyoming water development office, submit a report annually prior to each legislative session to the select water committee and the Wyoming water development commission on the activities of the office.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 65, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 34, § 6, authorizes the Wyoming water development commission to contract with the University of Wyoming in an amount not to exceed $116,000 from water development account I to fund the office of water programs established under W.S.

41-2-125

from July 1, 2004 through June 30, 2006.

Laws 2004, ch. 34, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.